Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-310
Specialized telecommunications equipment, defined.

Specialized telecommunications equipment means any telecommunications device enabling deaf, hard of hearing, or speech-impaired persons to communicate using conventional telephone systems. Specialized telecommunications equipment includes, but is not limited to, telecommunications devices for the deaf, signaling devices, and amplification devices.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 188.